Arkansas, session 2025, SB33.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. REGULAR SALARIES - OPERATIONS. There is hereby established
for the Department of Human Services - Division of Medical Services for the
2025-2026 fiscal year, the following maximum number of regular employees.

Maximum Annual
Maximum Salary Rate
Item Class No. of Fiscal Year
No. Code Title Employees 2025-2026
(1) N249N DHS DIVISION DIRECTOR 1 GRADE SE02
(2) L016N REGISTERED PHARMACIST 4 GRADE MP05
(3) L009C NURSE MANAGER 1 GRADE MP03
(4) L027C REGISTERED NURSE SUPERVISOR 3 GRADE MP02
*LCW014*
01/08/2025 3:16:21 PM LCW014

SB33
(5) L038C REGISTERED NURSE 9 GRADE MP01
(6) D006N STATE SYSTEMS ARCHITECT 1 GRADE IT10
(7) D007C INFORMATION SYSTEMS MANAGER 2 GRADE IT08
(8) D030C INFORMATION SYSTEMS COORDINATOR 1 GRADE IT07
(9) D061C INFORMATION SYSTEMS COORDINATION SPEC 1 GRADE IT05
(10) D058C COMPUTER OPERATIONS COORDINATOR 1 GRADE IT04
(11) D068C INFORMATION SYSTEMS ANALYST 1 GRADE IT04
(12) A019N DHS DEP CHIEF FIN OFFICER-MEDICAL SVCS 1 GRADE GS15
(13) G286C DMS DEPUTY DIRECTOR 1 GRADE GS15
(14) N100N DHS/DMS ADD - MEDICAL SERVICES 2 GRADE GS14
(15) G277C DHS PROCESS IMPROVEMENT DIRECTOR 1 GRADE GS13
(16) G025C ATTORNEY SUPERVISOR 1 GRADE GS12
(17) N168N DHS DIR HOME & COMMUNITY BASED SVCS 1 GRADE GS12
(18) A016C DHS DMS BUSINESS OPERATIONS MANAGER 8 GRADE GS12
(19) V036C AGENCY PROCUREMENT ADMINISTRATOR 1 GRADE GS10
(20) L010C DHS DMS MEDICAL ASSISTANCE MANAGER 3 GRADE GS10
(21) G099C DHS PROGRAM ADMINISTRATOR 17 GRADE GS09
(22) R021C BUDGET ANALYST 1 GRADE GS08
(23) G152C DHS PROGRAM MANAGER 8 GRADE GS08
(24) A081C AUDITOR 1 GRADE GS07
(25) G183C DHS PROGRAM COORDINATOR 7 GRADE GS07
(26) C037C ADMINISTRATIVE ANALYST 2 GRADE GS06
(27) R027C BUDGET SPECIALIST 1 GRADE GS06
(28) C013C MEDICAL SERVICES REPRESENTATIVE 1 GRADE GS06
(29) C036C ADMINISTRATIVE REVIEW ANALYST 1 GRADE GS05
(30) L070C HEALTH CARE ANALYST 3 GRADE GS05
(31) C054C LOCAL OFFICE ADMINISTRATIVE SPEC 1 GRADE GS05
(32) C056C ADMINISTRATIVE SPECIALIST III 3 GRADE GS04
(33) A098C FISCAL SUPPORT SPECIALIST 1 GRADE GS04
MAX. NO. OF EMPLOYEES 91

SECTION 2. EXTRA HELP - OPERATIONS. There is hereby authorized, for
the Department of Human Services - Division of Medical Services for the 2025-
2026 fiscal year, the following maximum number of part-time or temporary
employees, to be known as "Extra Help", payable from funds appropriated
herein for such purposes: ten (10) temporary or part-time employees, when
01/08/2025 3:16:21 PM LCW014

SB33
needed, at rates of pay not to exceed those provided in the Uniform
Classification and Compensation Act, or its successor, or this act for the
appropriate classification.

SECTION 3. APPROPRIATION - OPERATIONS. There is hereby appropriated,
to the Department of Human Services, to be payable from the paying account as
determined by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, for personal services
and operating expenses of the Department of Human Services - Division of
Medical Services for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $6,475,248
(02) EXTRA HELP 201,892
(03) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 2,225,570
(04) OVERTIME 2,241
(05) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 1,713,290
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 40,099
(C) PROF. FEES 800,000
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(06) DATA PROCESSING SERVICES 1,299,600
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $12,757,940

SECTION 4. APPROPRIATION - GRANTS. There is hereby appropriated, to
the Department of Human Services, to be payable from the paying account as
determined by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, for grant payments of
the Department of Human Services - Division of Medical Services for the
fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) ARKIDS B PROGRAM $167,661,480
(02) HOSPITAL AND MEDICAL SERVICES 8,336,005,717
(03) PRESCRIPTION DRUGS 625,636,547
01/08/2025 3:16:21 PM LCW014

SB33
(04) PRIVATE NURSING HOME CARE 1,048,963,434
(05) CHILD AND FAMILY LIFE INSTITUTE 2,100,000
(06) INFANT INFIRMARY 327,608
(07) PUBLIC NURSING HOME CARE 217,529,350
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $10,398,224,136

SECTION 5. APPROPRIATION - NURSING HOME CLOSURE COSTS. There is hereby
appropriated, to the Department of Human Services - Division of Medical
Services, to be payable from the Long-Term Care Trust Fund, for the payment
of relocation costs of residents in long-term care facilities, maintenance
and operation of a facility pending correction of deficiencies or closure,
and reimbursement of residents for personal funds lost for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) EXPENSES $4,500,000

SECTION 6. APPROPRIATION - LONG-TERM CARE FACILITY RECEIVERSHIP. There
is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Human Services, to be payable
from the Long Term Care Facility Receivership Fund Account, for the payment
of expenses of long-term care facility receivers as authorized by law of the
Department of Human Services - Division of Medical Services - Long-Term Care
Facility Receivership for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the
following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) EXPENSES $100,000

SECTION 7. APPROPRIATION - NURSING HOME QUALITY GRANTS. There is
hereby appropriated, to the Department of Human Services, to be payable from
the Long-Term Care Trust Fund, for Nursing Home Quality Care Grants of the
Department of Human Services - Division of Medical Services - Nursing Home
Quality Grants for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

01/08/2025 3:16:21 PM LCW014

SB33
ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) NURSING HOME QUALITY GRANTS AND AID $4,000,000

SECTION 8. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW.
MEDICAL SERVICES - GENERAL MEDICAID RATE METHODOLOGY PROVISIONS.
(a) Rates established by the Division of Medical Services for the services
or programs covered by this Act shall be calculated by the methodologies
approved by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services (CMS). The
Division of Medical Services shall have the authority to reduce or increase
rates based on the approved methodology. Further, the Division of Medical
Services shall have the authority to increase or decrease rates for good
cause including, but not limited to: (1) Identification of provider(s) who
can render needed services of equal quality at rates less than traditionally
charged and who meet the applicable federal and state laws, rules and
regulations pertaining to the provision of a particular service;
(2) Identification that a provider or group of providers has consistently
charged rates to the Arkansas Medicaid Program greater than to other
purchasers of medical services of similar size;
(3) The Division determines that there has been significant changes in the
technology or process by which services are provided by a provider or group
of providers which has affected the costs of providing services, or;
(4) A severe economic downturn in the Arkansas economy which has affected the
overall state budget of the Division of Medical Services.
The Division of Medical Services shall make available to requesting
providers, the CMS's inflationary forecasts (CMS Market Basket Index). Rates
established with cost of living increases based on the CMS Market Basket
Index or other indices will be adjusted annually except when the state budget
does not provide sufficient appropriation and funding to affect the change or
portion thereof.
(b) Any rate methodology changes proposed by the Division of Medical
Services both of a general and specific nature, shall be subject to prior
approval by the Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee.
Determining the maximum number of employees and the maximum amount of
appropriation and general revenue funding for a state agency each fiscal year
01/08/2025 3:16:21 PM LCW014

SB33
is the prerogative of the General Assembly. This is usually accomplished by
delineating such maximums in the appropriation act(s) for a state agency and
the general revenue allocations authorized for each fund and fund account by
amendment to the Revenue Stabilization law. Further, the General Assembly has
determined that the Department of Human Services – Division of Medical
Services may operate more efficiently if some flexibility is provided to the
Department of Human Services – Division of Medical Services authorizing broad
powers under this section. Therefore, it is both necessary and appropriate
that the General Assembly maintain oversight by requiring prior approval of
the Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee as provided by this
section. The requirement of approval by the Legislative Council or Joint
Budget Committee is not a severable part of this section. If the requirement
of approval by the Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee is ruled
unconstitutional by a court of competent jurisdiction, this entire section is
void.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2024
2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 9. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW. FUND
USAGE AUTHORIZED. The Arkansas Children's Hospital may request the Department
of Human Services - Division of Medical Services to retain in the Department
of Human Services Grant Fund account an amount not to exceed $2,100,000 from
funds made available by this Act in the Child and Family Life Institute line
item of the Grants appropriation to be used to match federal funds used for
supplemental Medicaid payments to Arkansas Children's Hospital. These
retained funds shall not be recovered to transfer to the General Revenue
Allotment Reserve Fund.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2024
2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 10. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW. ARKANSAS
HEALTH AND OPPORTUNITY FOR ME AND ARKANSAS HEALTH INSURANCE MARKETPLACE
RESTRICTIONS. (a) As used in this section, "Arkansas Health and Opportunity
for Me" means Arkansas Health and Opportunity for Me established under the
01/08/2025 3:16:21 PM LCW014

SB33
Arkansas Health and Opportunity for Me Act of 2021, Arkansas Code § 23-61-
1001 et seq.
(b)(1) Determining the maximum number of employees, the maximum amount
of appropriation, for what purposes an appropriation is authorized, and
general revenue funding for a state agency each fiscal year is the
prerogative of the General Assembly.
(2) The purposes of subdivision (b)(1) of this section are
typically accomplished by:
(A) Identifying the purpose in the appropriation act;
(B) Delineating such maximums in the appropriation act for
a state agency; and
(C) Delineating the general revenue allocations authorized
for each fund and fund account by amendment to the Revenue Stabilization Law,
Arkansas Code § 19-5-101 et seq.
(3) It is both necessary and appropriate that the General
Assembly restrict the use of appropriations authorized in this act.
(c)(1) Except as provided in this subsection, the Department of Human
Services shall not allocate, budget, expend, or utilize any appropriation
authorized by the General Assembly for the purpose of advertisement,
promotion, or other activities designed to promote or encourage enrollment in
the Arkansas Health Insurance Marketplace or Arkansas Health and Opportunity
for Me, including without limitation:
(A) Unsolicited communications mailed to potential
recipients;
(B) Television, radio, or online commercials;
(C) Billboard or mobile billboard advertising;
(D) Advertisements printed in newspapers, magazines, or
other print media; and
(E) Internet websites and electronic media.
(2) This subsection does not prohibit the department from:
(A) Direct communications with:
(i) Licensed insurance agents; and
(ii) Persons licensed by the department;
(B) Solicited communications with potential recipients;
(C)(i) Responding to an inquiry regarding the coverage for
which a potential recipient might be eligible, including without limitation
01/08/2025 3:16:21 PM LCW014

SB33
providing educational materials or information regarding any coverage for
which the individual might qualify.
(ii) Educational materials and information
distributed under subdivision (c)(2)(C)(i) of this section shall contain only
factual information and shall not contain subjective statements regarding the
coverage for which the potential recipient might be eligible; and
(D) Using an Internet website for the exclusive purpose of
enrolling individuals in the Arkansas Health Insurance Marketplace or
Arkansas Health and Opportunity for Me.
(d) The Department of Human Services shall not apply for or accept any
funds, including without limitation federal funds, for the purpose of
advertisement, promotion, or other activities designed to promote or
encourage enrollment in the Arkansas Health Insurance Marketplace or Arkansas
Health and Opportunity for Me.
(e)(1) Except as provided in subdivision (e)(2) of this section, the
Department of Human Services shall not:
(A)(i) Except as provided in subdivision (e)(1)(A)(ii) of
this section, allocate, budget, expend, or utilize an appropriation
authorized by the General Assembly for the purpose of funding activities of
navigators, guides, certified application counselors, and certified licensed
producers under the Arkansas Health Insurance Marketplace Navigator, Guide,
and Certified Application Counselors Act, Arkansas Code § 23-64-601 et seq.
(ii) Subdivision (e)(1)(A)(i) of this section does
not apply to regulatory and training responsibilities related to navigators,
guides, certified application counselors, and certified licensed producers;
and
(B) Apply for or accept any funds, including without
limitation federal funds, for the purpose of funding activities of
navigators, guides, certified application counselors, and certified licensed
producers under the Arkansas Health Insurance Marketplace Navigator, Guide,
and Certified Application Counselors Act, Arkansas Code § 23-64-601 et seq.
(2) Subdivision (e)(1) of this section does not apply to
certified application counselors at health related institutions, including
without limitation the University of Arkansas for Medical Sciences.
(f) An appropriation authorized by the General Assembly shall not be
subject to the provisions allowed through reallocation of resources or
01/08/2025 3:16:21 PM LCW014

SB33
transfer of appropriation authority for the purpose of transferring an
appropriation to any other appropriation authorized for the Department of
Human Services to be allocated, budgeted, expended, or utilized in a manner
prohibited by this section.
(g) The provisions of this section are severable, and the invalidity
of any subsection or subdivision of this section shall not affect other
provisions of the section that can be given effect without the invalid
provision.
(h) This section expires on June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 11. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW. MEDICAL
SERVICES – COMMUNITY AND EMPLOYMENT SUPPORTS MEDICAID WAIVER.
(a) Of the funding allocated to the Department of Human Services Grants
Fund Account under § 19-5-402, the first thirty-seven million six hundred
thousand dollars ($37,600,000) shall be set aside in its own subfund by the
Department of Human Services and shall be used only for home and community-
based services to individuals with intellectual and developmental
disabilities under the Community and Employment Supports Medicaid Waiver
Program or a successor Medicaid Waiver program that provides home and
community-based services to individuals with intellectual and developmental
disabilities.
(b) At the close of the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025 2026, any
unexpended balance of monies set aside as established in subsection (a)
herein shall be transferred forward and made available for the same purpose
for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026 2027.
(c) The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1,
2024 2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 12. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW. MEDICAID
PROGRAM TRUST FUND DISTRIBUTION AND BALANCE REPORT. (a) The Department of
Human Services shall submit monthly an “Arkansas Medicaid Program Trust Fund
Distribution and Balance" report to the Arkansas Legislative Council PEER
Subcommittee or, if meeting in a Legislative Session, the Joint Budget
Committee PEER/Review Subcommittee no later than ten days prior to the
01/08/2025 3:16:21 PM LCW014

SB33
Subcommittee's scheduled meeting date.
(b) The report shall summarize the current total fund balance and the
past five Fiscal Year ending total fund balances of the Arkansas Medicaid
Program Trust Fund.
(c) The report shall contain, cumulatively over the course of the
fiscal year, by month for each distribution from the Arkansas Medicaid
Program Trust Fund and its subfunds, the following:
(1) The amount of the distribution;
(2) The date of the distribution;
(3) The fund code to which the distribution was made;
(4) The appropriation line item name from which the funds are
distributed; and
(5) The purpose of the distribution.
(d) The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1,
2024 2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 13. COMPLIANCE WITH OTHER LAWS. Disbursement of funds
authorized by this act shall be limited to the appropriation for such agency
and funds made available by law for the support of such appropriations; and
the restrictions of the State Procurement Law, the General Accounting and
Budgetary Procedures Law, the Revenue Stabilization Law, the Regular Salary
Procedures and Restrictions Act, or their successors, and other fiscal
control laws of this State, where applicable, and regulations promulgated by
the Department of Finance and Administration, as authorized by law, shall be
strictly complied with in disbursement of said funds.

SECTION 14. LEGISLATIVE INTENT. It is the intent of the General
Assembly that any funds disbursed under the authority of the appropriations
contained in this act shall be in compliance with the stated reasons for
which this act was adopted, as evidenced by the Agency Requests, Executive
Recommendations and Legislative Recommendations contained in the budget
manuals prepared by the Department of Finance and Administration, letters, or
summarized oral testimony in the official minutes of the Arkansas Legislative
Council or Joint Budget Committee which relate to its passage and adoption.

SECTION 15. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the
01/08/2025 3:16:21 PM LCW014

SB33
General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits
the appropriation of funds for more than a one (1) year period; that the
effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 2025 is essential to the operation of
the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in
the event of an extension of the legislative session, the delay in the
effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 2025 could work irreparable harm
upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental
programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act
being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health
and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 2025.


























01/08/2025 3:16:21 PM LCW014